Massachusetts, session 194th, H1308.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12W of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting
after the first paragraph the following:-
Whenever any physician has reason to believe a person eighteen years or over is unable
to give informed consent, including when a person is in a state institution or under guardianship
under chapter 190B of the General Laws, no such sterilization shall be performed.
SECTION 2: Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting at the end of Section 10N the following new Section:-
Section 10O. Expanded Medicaid Coverage for Voluntary Female Sterilization
of 2

(1) For purposes of this section, the following words shall have the following meanings:
“Decision Counseling”, a counseling model for providers to ensure patients are fully
informed about the effects and permanency of sterilization.
''Informed written consent'', a written consent form for the requested provision of
voluntary female sterilization.
“Voluntary Female Sterilization”, any medical procedure, treatment, or operation for the
purpose of rendering an individual permanently incapable of reproducing performed at the
request of the individual.
(2) Coverage of Voluntary Female Sterilization Services:
The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance
organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators under contract
to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall provide coverage
for voluntary female sterilization even in the event that an individual covered by a Medicaid
managed care organization or primary care clinician plan has not fulfilled the federally required
30-day waiting period provided that the individual has completed Decision Counseling and
signed an informed written consent.
of 2